Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-423.01
Mental illness, defined.

Mental illness means a wide range of mental health disorders that affect mood, thinking, and behavior and can result in significantly impaired judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to address basic life necessities and requires care and treatment for health, safety, or recovery of the individual or for the safety of others.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 54.
July 19, 2018